District of Columbia statutes.
47-842

Historic property tax relief — Assessment of officially designated buildings.

For certain officially designated historic buildings in the District, the Mayor shall, in addition to assessing at full market value, assess land and improvement on the basis of current use and structures of the buildings, which latter assessment, if it is less than full market value, shall be the basis of tax liability to the District.

History

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1058, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 432
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2178, Pub. L. 93-635, § 15(c)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-842.
1973 Ed., § 47-652.